Massachusetts, session 194th, H3018.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 6 of chapter 62 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
paragraph (a) the following new paragraph:— 
(b) A credit of $600 shall be allowed against the taxes due if the taxpayer has provided 
more than one-half of the support for an elderly relative who has attained the age of 70 before the 
taxable year, or for a totally disabled relative with Alzheimer’s Disease, provided that the 
relative resided with the taxpayer for more than 6 months of the taxable year and provided 
further that the adjusted gross income of the relative does not exceed $20,000 in the case of a 
single return and $35,000 in the case of a joint return. If the credit provided in this section 

of 2 9 reduces the tax to zero, the taxpayer shall be entitled to a refund equal to the amount by which 
the amount of the credit exceeded the amount of tax due.